Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-473
988 Suicide and Crisis Lifeline; immunity from liability.

Except for failure to use reasonable care or for intentional acts, each person involved in the provision of 988 Suicide and Crisis Lifeline service pursuant to section 86-472, including 988 service providers, call-center operators, and counselors, shall be immune from liability or the payment of damages in the performance of installing, maintaining, or providing such service, including providing interoperable connections between the 988 Suicide and Crisis Lifeline and the 911 service system.

Laws 2024, LB1200, § 67.
July 19, 2024